Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 7 Precincts and Polling Places

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-260.
Designation of precincts.

Each election district existing as of December 31, 1982, shall constitute a separate precinct until and unless changed as provided in this article.

The governing authority of each municipality shall determine and establish the number and boundaries of municipal voting precincts in accordance with the provisions of this article. Insofar as practicable, the precincts shall be the same as those for state and county elections.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1231; Code 1868, § 1312; Code 1873, § 1285; Code 1882, § 1285; Ga. L. 1893, p. 29, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 69; Civil Code 1910, § 79; Code 1933, § 34-1301; Code 1933, § 34-701, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Cross references.

Further provisions regarding authority of municipalities to reapportion election districts, §

36-35-4.1

.

21-2-261.
Change in boundaries of precinct; creation of new precincts.

The superintendent of a county or the governing authority of a municipality may, as provided in Code Section 21-2-262, divide or redivide any precinct in that county or municipality into two or more precincts of compact and contiguous territory, or alter the bounds of any precinct in that county or municipality, or form a precinct out of two or more adjoining precincts or parts of precincts in that county or municipality, or consolidate adjoining precincts in that county or municipality, so as to suit the convenience of the electors and to promote the public interests.

No new precinct shall be formed that shall contain less than 100 electors.

The bounds of a precinct shall not be altered on a day in which a primary or election is held, or during the period of 60 days prior to any general primary or election, or during the period of 30 days prior to any special primary or election. The superintendent of a county or the governing authority of a municipality shall promptly notify the board of registrars of any change in the bounds of precincts.

Any precinct established or altered under the provisions of this article must conform with the requirements of subsection (a) of Code Section 21-2-261.1.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-702, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 145, § 11; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Cross references.

Further provisions regarding authority of municipalities to reapportion election districts, §

36-35-4.1

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Precincts, changes in boundaries, notification of electors, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Election Districts and Polling Places, § 183-1-7-.01.

21-2-261.1.
Boundary requirements for precincts.

All voting precincts established or altered under the provisions of this article shall consist of areas which are bounded on all sides only by:

Visible features which are readily distinguishable upon the ground (such as streets, railroad tracks, streams, lakes, and ridges) and which are indicated upon official Department of Transportation maps, current census maps, city or county planning maps, official municipal maps, official county maps, or any combination of such maps;

The boundaries of public parks;

The boundaries of public school grounds;

The boundaries of churches;

The boundaries of counties and incorporated municipalities; or

The boundaries of restricted access residential communities.

The superintendent of a county or the governing authority of a municipality shall notify the board of registrars within ten days after such changes are adopted.

The superintendent of a county or the governing authority of a municipality shall file with the Secretary of State and the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office:

A map reflecting any changes in precincts within 20 days after the changes are made;

A copy of any communications to or from the United States Department of Justice relating to any precincts within 20 days after such communication is sent or received;

A copy of any pleading initiating a court action potentially affecting any precincts within 30 days after it is filed;

A copy of any court order affecting any precincts within 20 days after it is entered;

For precincts that use the boundaries of a restricted access residential community, a map clearly delineating the boundaries of the community and clearly depicting the streets contained within such community and a list of the streets within such community and the address ranges of such streets; and

Any other documentation necessary to allow the Secretary of State to maintain a current listing of all precincts in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-261.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1, § 6; Ga. L. 1984, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 617, § 8; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1406, § 19; Ga. L. 1995, p. 8, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 145, § 12; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 270, § 1/HB 87.

21-2-262.
Investigation as to division, redivision, alteration, formation, or consolidation of precincts; petition of electors or board of registrars.

The superintendent may upon his or her own motion direct the board of registrars to investigate the division or redivision of a precinct into two or more precincts, or the alteration of the bounds of any precinct, or the formation of one or more precincts out of two or more existing precincts or parts thereof or the consolidation of adjoining precincts. The board of registrars shall make a full investigation of the facts and shall promptly report to the superintendent its findings and recommendations as to the division, redivision, alteration, formation, or consolidation of the precincts. If the board of registrars shall find that a division, redivision, alteration, formation, or consolidation of precincts will promote the convenience of the electors and the public interests, it shall recommend a proper division, redivision, alteration, formation, or consolidation of precincts which conforms to the requirements of subsection (a) of Code Section 21-2-261.1 and shall accompany its report with a map, plat, or draft of the new election precinct or precincts proposed by it.

(a.1)

Upon the petition of 20 electors or of the county executive committee of a political party to the superintendent of the county, praying for the division or redivision of a precinct into two or more precincts, or for the alteration of the bounds of any precinct, or for the formation of one or more precincts out of two or more existing precincts or parts thereof, or for the consolidation of adjoining precincts, the superintendent shall refer such petition to the board of registrars, which shall make a full investigation of the facts and shall promptly report to the superintendent its findings and recommendations as to the division, redivision, alteration, formation, or consolidation of the precincts prayed for. If the board of registrars shall find that a division, redivision, alteration, formation, or consolidation of precincts will promote the convenience of the electors and the public interests, it shall recommend a proper division, redivision, alteration, formation, or consolidation of precincts which conforms to the requirements of subsection (a) of Code Section 21-2-261.1 and shall accompany its report with a map, plat, or draft of the new election precinct or precincts proposed by it. Such petitions may specify the boundaries desired by the petitioners and may be accompanied by a map setting forth such boundaries.

The board of registrars may also petition the superintendent for the division or redivision of any precinct into two or more precincts, or for the alteration of the bounds of any precinct, or for the formation of one or more precincts out of two or more existing precincts or parts thereof, or for the consolidation of adjoining precincts, accompanying its petition by a description of the proposed new precincts and by a map, plat, or draft thereof.

Upon the presentation of any such petition by the board of registrars or upon the filing by the board of its report and recommendations as to any investigation presented under subsection (a) of this Code section, the superintendent may make such order for the division, redivision, alteration, formation, or consolidation of precincts as will, in the superintendent’s opinion, promote the convenience of electors and the public interests; provided, however, that the superintendent shall not make any final order for the division, redivision, alteration, formation, or consolidation of precincts until at least 30 days after notice of such change shall have been advertised in the legal organ of the county. A copy of such notice shall be immediately submitted to the Secretary of State. Such notice shall state briefly the division, redivision, alteration, formation, or consolidation of precincts recommended by the board of registrars and the date upon which the same will be considered by the superintendent and shall contain a warning that any person objecting thereto must file his or her objections with the superintendent prior to such date. Upon the making of any such final order by the superintendent, a copy thereof shall be certified by the superintendent to the board of registrars.

In any county having a population of more than 250,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1970 or any such future census, the powers and duties conferred upon the superintendent by this Code section and Code Sections 21-2-261 and 21-2-261.1 shall be exercised and performed by the governing authority of the county.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-703, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1199, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 21; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 34, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 56, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1406, § 20; Ga. L. 1996, p. 145, § 13; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 13/HB 316.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, in subsection (c), substituted “30 days” for “ten days” near the end of the first sentence and added the second sentence.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Precincts, changes in boundaries, notification of electors, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Election Districts and Polling Places, § 183-1-7-.01.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

21-2-263.
Reduction in size of, or provision of additional voting equipment or poll workers to, precincts containing more than 2,000 electors when voting in such precincts at previous general election not completed one hour after closing of polls.

If, at the previous general election, a precinct contained more than 2,000 electors and if all those electors desiring to vote had not completed voting one hour following the closing of the polls, the superintendent shall either reduce the size of said precinct so that it shall contain not more than 2,000 electors in accordance with the procedures prescribed by this chapter for the division, alteration, and consolidation of precincts no later than 60 days before the next general election or provide additional voting equipment or poll workers, or both, before the next general election. For administering this Code section, the chief manager of a precinct which contained more than 2,000 electors at the previous general election shall submit a report thereof, under oath, to the superintendent as to the time required for completion of voting by all persons in line at the time the polls were closed. Any such change in the boundaries of a precinct shall conform with the requirements of subsection (a) of Code Section 21-2-261.1.

If, at the previous general election, a precinct contained more than 2,000 electors and if electors desiring to vote on the day of the election had to wait in line for more than one hour before checking in to vote, the superintendent shall either reduce the size of such precinct so that it shall contain not more than 2,000 electors in accordance with the procedures prescribed by this chapter for the division, alteration, and consolidation of precincts no later than 60 days before the next general election or provide additional voting equipment or poll workers, or both, before the next general election. For administering this Code section, the chief manager of a precinct which contained more than 2,000 electors at the previous general election shall submit a report thereof to the superintendent of the reported time from entering the line to checking in to vote. Such wait time shall be measured no fewer than three different times throughout the day (in the morning, at midday, and prior to the close of polls) and such results shall be recorded on a form provided by the Secretary of State. Any such change in the boundaries of a precinct shall conform with the requirements of subsection (a) of Code Section 21-2-261.1.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-704.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1968, p. 860, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1406, § 21; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 683, § 8/SB 82; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 18/SB 202.

The 2021 amendment,

effective March 25, 2021, designated the existing provisions of this Code section as subsection (a), inserted a comma following “If” and “election” at the beginning of the first sentence of subsection (a), and added subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

21-2-264.
Reimbursement of counties and municipalities for costs incurred pursuant to alteration of precinct boundaries.

In all cases of the division, redivision, alteration, formation, or consolidation of precincts, the costs of the proceedings shall be paid by the county or municipal governing authority, as appropriate. There may be appropriated to the Secretary of State funds to be granted to counties or municipalities for purposes of meeting the requirements of Code Section 21-2-261.1. Upon the filing of a written request by the election officials of any qualified county or municipality, a qualified county or municipality shall be reimbursed for all reasonable expenses incurred by such county or municipality which are directly related to the redrawing of voting precinct boundaries, verification of voting precinct residency, notification of voter precinct and polling place changes, and compilation and preparation of the electors list as necessitated by Code Section 21-2-261.1; provided, however, that such reimbursement of costs shall not exceed 25¢ per registered voter whose name appeared on such county’s or municipality’s electors list as of January 1, 1982. Any qualified county or municipality seeking reimbursement of such costs shall present an itemized description of such costs to the Secretary of State. If the Secretary of State, after a review of the report of such costs incurred by a county or municipality, shall find that all or portions of such costs were reasonable and were directly related to the preparation of such descriptions and lists, he or she shall approve all of those parts of the costs deemed reasonable and shall reimburse the counties or municipalities for such expenses. Any state funds necessary to carry out the provisions of this Code section shall come only from those funds appropriated to the Secretary of State specifically for the purpose of implementing the provisions of Code Section 21-2-261.1. If such funds are not sufficient to bear completely the cost of fully implementing the provisions of Code Section 21-2-261.1, payment to the counties or municipalities seeking assistance shall be made on a pro rata basis subject to the availability of appropriated funds.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 321, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-704, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 964, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 145, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 30/HB 244; Ga. L. 2006, p. 69, § 1/SB 467.

21-2-265.
Duty of superintendent to select polling places; change; notice of change; objecting to proposed change; space for political parties holding primaries; facilities for disabled voters; selection of polling place outside precinct; restriction on changing polling place.

The superintendent of a county or the governing authority of a municipality shall select and fix the polling place within each precinct and may, either on his, her, or its own motion or on petition of ten electors of a precinct, change the polling place within any precinct. Except in case of an emergency or unavoidable event occurring within ten days of a primary or election, which emergency or event renders any polling place unavailable for use at such primary or election, the superintendent of a county or the governing authority of a municipality shall not change any polling place until notice of the proposed change shall have been published for once a week for two consecutive weeks in the legal organ for the county or municipality in which the polling place is located. Additionally, during the seven days before and on the day of the first election following such change, a notice of such change shall be posted on the previous polling place and at three other places in the immediate vicinity thereof. Each notice posted shall state the location to which the polling place has been moved and shall direct electors to the new location. At least one notice at the previous polling place shall be a minimum of four feet by four feet in size. The occupant or owner of the previous polling place, or his or her agent, shall be notified in writing of such change at the time notice is published in the legal organ.

Except in case of an emergency or unavoidable event occurring within ten days of a primary or election, which emergency or event renders any polling place unavailable for use, if a petition is presented to the superintendent of a county or the governing authority of a municipality on or before the day set for hearing of the petition for change of a polling place, signed by 20 percent of the electors of the precinct objecting to the proposed change, such change shall not be ordered.

In primaries, the superintendent of a county or the governing authority of a municipality in selecting and fixing the polling place in each precinct shall select a polling place which will provide adequate space for all parties conducting their primaries therein.

The superintendent of a county or the governing authority of a municipality, in selecting and fixing a polling place in each precinct, shall select, if practicable, a polling place with suitable and appropriate access for disabled electors. If no such practicable locations exist within the precinct, the superintendent of a county or the governing authority of a municipality may effect temporary modifications to such existing locations as will, in his or her or its judgment, provide more convenient and appropriate access to the polling place by the disabled elector. No polling place shall be selected or used under any circumstances which does not have suitable and appropriate access for persons with disabilities for the purpose of voting; and any person, whether or not personally aggrieved, may bring an action for mandamus to require that all polling places in the county or municipality have suitable and appropriate access for persons with disabilities for the purpose of voting.

On and after January 1, 2018, the superintendent may establish the polling place for a precinct outside the boundaries of the precinct if there is no suitable facility within the precinct which could be used as a polling place and if, by so doing, such polling place would better serve the needs of the voters; provided, however, that no polling place shall be established outside of the boundaries of the precinct within 90 days of a primary or election, and the superintendent shall submit a report to the State Election Board to demonstrate that there is no suitable facility within the precinct prior to establishing the polling place outside the boundaries of the precinct.

A polling place shall not be changed on a day in which a primary, election, or runoff is held, or during the 60 day period prior to any general primary or general election or runoff from such primary or election, nor shall a polling place be changed in the 30 day period prior to any special primary or special election or runoff from such special primary or special election, except, in the discretion of the superintendent, when an emergency or event occurs during such time period which renders the polling place unavailable for use at such general primary, general election, special primary, special election, or runoff.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-705, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 329, § 8; Ga. L. 1978, p. 812, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1256, § 1.1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, §§ 14, 15; Ga. L. 1996, p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 101, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, §§ 8, 32; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 20; Ga. L. 2006, p. 888, § 2/HB 1435; Ga. L. 2017, p. 697, § 13/HB 268; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 14/HB 316; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 19/SB 202.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in subsection (e), substituted “On and after January 1, 2018, the” for “The” at the beginning, and added the proviso at the end.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, added subsection (f).

The 2021 amendment,

effective March 25, 2021, in subsection (a), substituted “during the seven days before and on the day of the first election” for “on the first election day” at the beginning of the third sentence, and added the present fourth and fifth sentences.

Cross references.

Access to and use of public buildings and facilities by physically handicapped persons generally, T. 30, C. 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Accessibility for elderly and disabled voters, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Registration of Electors, § 183-1-6-.04.

Precincts, changes in boundaries, notification of electors, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Election Districts and Polling Places, § 183-1-7-.01.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).